Georgia, session 2025_26, HB664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 6 of Chapter 3 of Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
property owners' associations, is amended by revising Code Section 44-3-222, relating to
creation of property owners' development and affirmative election to be governed by article,
as follows:
"44-3-222.
A property owners' development shall come into existence upon either the recordation of
the declaration pursuant to this article, or the amendment of a recorded declaration in
accordance with paragraph (2) of Code Section 44-3-235, or the recordation of an
instrument pursuant to paragraph (3) of Code Section 44-3-235. Any declaration or
H. B. 664
- 1 -

LC 62 0120
amendment intending to bring or avail a development of the benefits and provisions of this
article shall state an affirmative election to be so governed. Any original declaration shall
be duly executed by or on behalf of all of the owners of the submitted property. Any such
amendment to an existing declaration shall be executed in accordance with the terms of the
recorded declaration being amended thereby. Any such instrument specified in
paragraph (3) of Code Section 44-3-235 shall be executed pursuant to that Code section."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended in Code Section 44-3-226, relating to amendments of
instrument and presumption of validity in court action, by revising subsection (b) as follows:
"(b)(1) No amendment of an instrument shall require approval of lot owners to which
more than 80 percent of the association vote pertains and the mortgagees holding 80
percent of the voting interest of mortgaged lots; any property owners' association which
exists prior to July 1, 1994, and amends its documents to avail itself of the provisions of
this article or otherwise submits to this article pursuant to Code Section 44-3-235 shall
be deemed to have amended the association instrument to conform to this limitation.
This subsection shall not be deemed to eliminate or modify any right of the declarant
provided for in the instrument to approve amendments to the instrument so long as the
declarant owns any lot primarily for the purpose of sale and, furthermore, this Code
section shall not be construed as modifying or altering the rights of a mortgagee set forth
elsewhere in this article.
(2) Provisions of any declaration of an association that submits to this article pursuant
to paragraph (3) of Code Section 44-3-235 that require a majority in excess of 80 percent
to amend shall not be affected or modified by this Code section if, by the first anniversary
of the date of submission, the association and those mortgagees permitted to vote on
amendments vote to retain the requirements by a majority and, if no such vote occurs,
H. B. 664
- 2 -

LC 62 0120
those provisions requiring more than 80 percent of the voting interest shall be deemed to
only require 80 percent of the voting interest.
(3) This subsection shall not be deemed to eliminate or modify any right of the declarant
provided for in the instrument to approve amendments to the instrument so long as the
declarant owns any lot primarily for the purpose of sale and, furthermore, this Code
section shall not be construed as modifying or altering the rights of a mortgagee set forth
elsewhere in this article."
SECTION 3.
Said article is further amended in Code Section 44-3-235, relating to applicability of article,
by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a)(1) This article shall apply to all property which is submitted to this article.
(2) This article shall also apply to any association of owners subject to a recorded
declaration of covenants upon property, which covenants are administered by an owners'
association in which membership is mandatory for all owners of lots in the development,
which declaration is amended in accordance with Code Section 44-3-222 in order to
submit the property owners' association to this article; provided, however, that any
amendment must conform the instrument creating the property owners' association to this
article, and the property owners' development shall thereafter be deemed to be submitted
to this article.
(3) This article shall also apply to any association of owners subject to a recorded
declaration of covenants upon property, which covenants are administered by an owners'
association in which membership is mandatory for all owners of lots in the development
subject to such declaration, where 80 percent of the association votes to approve the
submission of such association to this article and records an instrument certifying such
vote. Such instrument shall give notice that the recordation of the instrument subjects the
association to the provisions of this article."
H. B. 664
- 3 -

LC 62 0120
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 664
- 4 -